District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.57

Performance incentives.

The Mayor may authorize performance incentives for exceptional service for subordinate agency heads not to exceed 10% of the rate of basic pay in any year. Exceptional service incentives may be paid only if:

(1)

The agency head is bound by a performance contract, available to the public upon request, that clearly identifies measurable goals and outcomes; and

(2)

The agency head has exceeded contractual expectations in the year for which the incentive is paid.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1057
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2802, 49 DCR 6968

History

1981 Ed., § 1-611.57.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 14-190 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “The Mayor may authorize performance incentives for exceptional service for subordinate agency heads not to exceed 10% of the rate of basic pay in any year. Exceptional service incentives may be paid only when the agency head is bound by a performance contract that clearly identifies measurable goals and outcomes and the agency head has exceeded contractual expectations in the year for which the incentive is paid.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2702 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).

Emergency Legislation

Short title of title XXVIII of Law 14-190: Section 2801 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that title XXVIII of the act may be cited as the Executive Compensation and Fiscal Responsibility Amendment Act of 2002.

Short Title

Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.

Editor's Notes